Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-10] Considerations for partition in
kind. (a) In determining under section 668A-9(a) whether partition in
kind would result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group, the court
shall consider the following:

(1) Whether the heirs property practicably may be
divided among the cotenants;

(2) Whether partition in kind would apportion the
property in such a way that the aggregate fair market value of the parcels
resulting from the division would be materially less than the value of the
property if it were sold as a whole, taking into account the condition under
which the court-ordered sale likely would occur;

(3) Evidence of the collective duration of ownership
or possession of the property by a cotenant and one or more predecessors in
title or predecessors in possession to the cotenant who are or were relatives
of that cotenant or each other;

(4) A cotenant's sentimental attachment to the
property, including, without limitation, any attachment arising because the
property has ancestral or other unique or special value to the cotenant;

(5) The lawful use being made of the property by a
cotenant and the degree to which the cotenant would be harmed if the cotenant
could not continue the same use of the property;

(6) The degree to which the cotenants have
contributed their pro rata share of the property taxes, insurance, and other
expenses associated with maintaining ownership of the property or have
contributed to the physical improvement, maintenance, or upkeep of the
property; and

(7) Any other relevant factor.

(b) The court shall not consider any one
factor in subsection (a) to be dispositive without weighing the totality of all
relevant factors and circumstances. [L 2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next